Utah statutes.
58-41-3.   Scope of licenses -- Practicing without license prohibited.

(1)  Licensing shall be granted independently either in speech-language pathology or audiology.  A person shall be licensed in one or both areas when he meets the respective qualifications.

(2)  No person may practice, represent himself to be, consult, or perform as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist in this state unless he is licensed in accordance with  this chapter.

